Utah statutes.
23-14-16.   Unexpended fund balances converted to general fund account.

The state auditor and director of the Division of Finance shall, at the close of the fiscal year, convert into the Wildlife Resources Account in the General Fund all unexpended balances of the wildlife resources fund not legally obligated by contract or appropriated by the Wildlife Board for capital outlay projects or other programs which may extend beyond the close of the fiscal year.

